Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,109
Adult institutions; disciplinary procedures; laws governing.

Disciplinary procedures in adult institutions administered by the Department of Correctional Services shall be governed by the provisions of sections 83-4,109 to 83-4,123.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 51.

Based on their plain language, the disciplinary procedure statutes and regulations were enacted to prescribe disciplinary procedures for inmates who allegedly engaged in misconduct, and not to protect an inmate who seeks an investigation into other inmates' alleged misconduct. Ryan v. State, 317 Neb. 337, 9 N.W.3d 888 (2024).

None of the disciplinary procedures indicate that their purpose is to create a legal duty of the State, owed to an inmate, to file a particular type of report or undertake a particular type of investigation in response to other inmates' alleged misconduct against the inmate. Ryan v. State, 317 Neb. 337, 9 N.W.3d 888 (2024).

Sections 83-4,109 to 83-4,123 constitute a special act relating to disciplinary procedures in adult correctional institutions and control over the more general provisions which are found in the Administrative Procedure Act. Reed v. Parratt, 207 Neb. 796, 301 N.W.2d 343 (1981).